West Virginia, session 2026, SB299.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-1C-11b of this code, relating to the Tax Department (valuation of timberland and managed timberland, 110 CSR 01H), is authorized.